North Carolina statutes. Chapter 131D. Inspection and Licensing of Facilities.
Article 1B. Licensing of Maternity Homes.

§ 131D-10.10.
Licensing of Maternity Homes.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall inspect and license all maternity homes established in the State under rules adopted by the Social Services Commission. The Commission shall adopt rules establishing educational requirements, minimum age, relevant experience, and criminal record status for executive directors and staff employed in maternity homes.

Facilities subject to the provisions of this section shall include:

Institutions or homes maintained for the purpose of receiving pregnant women for care before, during, and after delivery, and

Institutions or lying-in homes maintained for the purpose of receiving pregnant women for care before and after delivery, when delivery takes place in a licensed hospital.

History.

1868-9, c. 170, s. 3; Code, ss. 2332, 2333; Rev., ss. 3914, 3915; 1917, c. 170, s. 1; 1919, c. 46, ss. 1, 2; C.S., s. 5006; 1925, c. 90, ss. 1, 2; 1927, c. 65; 1931, c. 175; 1937, c. 319, s. 2; c. 436, ss. 3, 5; 1941, c. 270, s. 1; 1945, c. 185; 1951, c. 103; c. 1098, s. 2; 1953, c. 117; 1955, c. 269; 1957, c. 100, s. 1; c. 541, s. 7; 1959, c. 684; 1961, c. 51, s. 2; 1965, cc. 391, 1175; 1969, c. 546, s. 1; 1973, c. 476, s. 138; 1981, c. 275, s. 2; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 2007-30, s. 1; 2009-188, s. 1; 2009-462, s. 1(b).

Cross References.

As to criminal provisions for patient abuse and neglect, see

G.S. 14-32.2

.